Utah statutes.
31A-6a-108.   Obligation of reimbursement insurance issuers.

Providers under this chapter are considered to be the agent of the issuer of the reimbursement insurance for purposes of Section 31A-23a-410. In cases where a provider is acting as an administrator and enlists other providers, the provider acting as the administrator shall notify the issuer of the reimbursement insurance of the other providers.

